Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-945
University of Nebraska at Omaha; urban-oriented programs; primary responsibility; doctoral programs; authorized; when.

The University of Nebraska at Omaha shall continue to be the primary unit within the University of Nebraska for urban-oriented programs. Subject to approval by the Board of Regents of the University of Nebraska, the University of Nebraska at Omaha may offer doctoral programs upon demonstration of compelling need in disciplines in which it has a demonstrated capacity as authorized and approved by the Coordinating Commission for Postsecondary Education pursuant to sections 85-1413 and 85-1414. There shall be no duplication of administrative responsibility for any urban-oriented program among units of the university.

Laws 1978, LB 756, § 29;

Laws 1991, LB 663, § 92.